Nevada, session 83, AB289.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Board of Regents may establish a course of study in
financial literacy. If established, the course of study must include,
without limitation, instruction relating to:
1. Preparing a budget;
2. Developing a financial plan;
3. The concept of opportunity cost with respect to spending
and saving decisions;
4. Preparing and filing tax returns;
5. The use of credit and the incurrence of debt; and
6. Applying for and receiving financial aid.
H
-
*AB289_R2*